New Jersey, session 222, A3612.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following language is added to section 1 of P.L.2025, c.74, the annual appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2026: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Service Programs Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary and in addition to the amount hereinabove appropriated for NJSHARES  S.M.A.R.T. Program, an amount not to exceed $10,000,000 is appropriated from the Universal Service Fund for utility payment assistance through the NJSHARES  S.M.A.R.T. Program, including, but not limited to, utility arrearage assistance, which shall be awarded pursuant to guidelines established by the Commissioner of Community Affairs to homeowners and tenants of residential property throughout the State suffering financial difficulties.  The commissioner shall design and establish program criteria and guidelines consistent with this provision which the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate to award grants to eligible homeowners and tenants in an expeditious manner to enable eligible homeowners and tenants to comply with their utility obligations.  To be eligible for a grant under this program, a homeowner or tenant shall not be eligible for, or a recipient of funding from, private insurance or from any other available funding opportunity which may be considered a duplication of benefits. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.